North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 1. Voluntary Dissolution.

§ 55A-14-01.
Dissolution by incorporators or directors prior to commencement of activities.

A corporation that has not admitted members entitled to vote on dissolution, has not commenced activities, and has no assets may be dissolved by action of its board of directors or a majority of its incorporators, if there are no directors, by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The names and addresses of its officers, if any;

The names and addresses of its directors, if any, or if none, the names and addresses of its incorporators;

The date of its incorporation;

That the corporation has not admitted members entitled to vote on dissolution, has not commenced activities, and has no assets;

That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid; and

That a majority of the incorporators or directors authorized the dissolution.

Upon the filing of articles of dissolution under this section, the corporation becomes nonexistent and is cancelled as if such corporation had never been created.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, ss. 41, 43; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

The effect of dissolution under this section is the same as the effect under former G.S. 55A-57.1 of voluntarily surrendering corporate rights prior to commencement of activities.

§ 55A-14-02.
Dissolution by directors, members, and third persons.

Unless this Chapter, the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or the board of directors or members (acting pursuant to subsection (c) of this section) require a greater vote or voting by class, dissolution is authorized if a plan of dissolution meeting the requirements of

G.S. 55A-14-03

is approved:

By the board;

By the members entitled to vote thereon, if any, by two-thirds of the votes cast or a majority of the votes entitled to be cast on the plan of dissolution, whichever is less; and

In writing by any person or persons whose approval is required by a provision of the articles of incorporation authorized by

G.S. 55A-10-30

for an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

If the corporation does not have members entitled to vote thereon, dissolution shall be approved by a vote of a majority of the directors then in office. The corporation shall provide at least five days’ written notice of any directors’ meeting at which such approval will be considered. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolution of the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan of dissolution.

The board of directors may condition its approval of the proposed dissolution, and the members entitled to vote thereon may condition their approval of the dissolution on receipt of a higher percentage of affirmative votes or on any other basis.

If the board of directors seeks to have dissolution approved by the members entitled to vote thereon at a membership meeting, the corporation shall give notice of the membership meeting to those members in accordance with

G.S. 55A-7-05

. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider dissolving the corporation and contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan of dissolution.

If the board seeks to have dissolution approved by the members entitled to vote thereon by written consent or written ballot, the material soliciting the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 41; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section differs from former G.S. 55A-44 in that a plan of dissolution may generally be approved by a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the members or by two-thirds of the votes cast at a meeting duly held at which a quorum is present, whichever is less. The articles of incorporation or bylaws may require a greater vote, and the board of directors or members, acting pursuant to subsection (c), may condition their approval of a plan of dissolution upon receipt of a higher percentage of votes than otherwise required or on any other basis. Subdivision (a)(3) and subsection (c) had no counterpart in the prior law.

§ 55A-14-03.
Plan of dissolution.

The plan of dissolution approved pursuant to

G.S. 55A-14-02

shall provide that all liabilities and obligations of the corporation be paid and discharged, or adequate provisions be made therefor, and that the remainder of the corporation’s assets be distributed as follows:

Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with such requirements;

Other assets, if any, of a charitable or religious corporation shall, subject to the articles of incorporation or bylaws, be transferred or conveyed to one or more of the following: the United States, a state, a charitable or religious corporation, or a person that is exempt under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor section;

Other assets, if any, of a corporation that is not a charitable or religious corporation shall, subject to the articles of incorporation and bylaws, be distributed as provided in the plan of dissolution.

The plan of dissolution may set forth other provisions relating to the dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (a) sets forth the provisions to be included in the plan of dissolution that must be approved pursuant to

G.S. 55A-14-02

. Under prior law, there was no requirement that a plan of dissolution be approved.

§ 55A-14-04.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized pursuant to

G.S. 55A-14-02

, the corporation may dissolve by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

The name of the corporation;

The names and addresses of its officers;

The names and addresses of its directors;

The plan of dissolution as required by

G.S. 55A-14-03

;

The date dissolution was authorized;

If approval by members was not required, a statement to that effect and a statement that the plan of dissolution was approved by a sufficient vote of the board of directors;

If approval by members was required, a statement that the plan of dissolution was approved as required by this Chapter; and

If approval of dissolution by some person or persons other than the members or the board of directors is required pursuant to

G.S. 55A-14-02

(a)(3), a statement that the approval was obtained.

A corporation is dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 7; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section differs from prior law in that the plan of dissolution required by

G.S. 55A-14-03

must be set forth in the articles of dissolution and in that articles of dissolution are the only required filing. A corporation is dissolved on the effective date of its articles of dissolution. There is no filing comparable to the certificate of dissolution issued by the Secretary of State under former G.S. 55A-49.

Articles of dissolution may be filed under this section at any time after dissolution is authorized. Under former G.S. 55A-48, articles of dissolution were filed only after all debts, liabilities and obligations of the corporation had been paid, or adequate provision made therefor, and after all of the remaining property and assets of the corporation had been transferred.

§ 55A-14-05.
Revocation of dissolution.

A corporation may revoke its dissolution authorized under

G.S. 55A-14-02

within 120 days of its effective date.

Revocation of dissolution shall be authorized in the same manner as the dissolution was authorized unless an authorization under

G.S. 55A-14-02

permitted revocation by action of the board of directors alone, in which event the board of directors may revoke the dissolution without action by the members or any other person.

After the revocation of dissolution is authorized, the corporation may revoke the dissolution by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of revocation of dissolution, together with a copy of its articles of dissolution, that set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The effective date of the dissolution that was revoked;

The date that the revocation of dissolution was authorized;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked the dissolution, a statement to that effect;

If the corporation’s board of directors revoked a dissolution authorized by the members alone or in conjunction with another person or persons, a statement that revocation was permitted by action by the board of directors alone pursuant to that authorization; and

If member or third person action was required to revoke the dissolution, a statement that the action was taken as required.

Revocation of dissolution is effective upon the effective date of the articles of revocation of dissolution.

When the revocation of dissolution is effective, it relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the dissolution and the corporation resumes carrying on its activities as if dissolution had never occurred, subject to the rights of any person who reasonably relied to his prejudice upon the filing of the articles of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Under former G.S. 55A-47, a corporation could revoke its dissolution at any time prior to the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the Secretary of State. Since the provision for issuing a certificate of dissolution has not been brought forward, this section provides that any revocation must occur within 120 days after the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

§ 55A-14-06.
Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved corporation continues its corporate existence but shall not carry on any activities except those appropriate to wind up and liquidate its affairs, including:

Preserving and protecting its assets;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities and obligations;

Disposing of its remaining assets in accordance with its plan of dissolution; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its assets and affairs.

Dissolution of a corporation does not:

Transfer title to the corporation’s property;

Subject its directors or officers to standards of conduct different from those prescribed in Article 8 of this Chapter;

Change quorum or voting requirements for its board of directors or members; change provisions for selection, resignation, or removal of its directors or officers or both; or change provisions for amending its bylaws;

Prevent commencement of a proceeding by or against the corporation in its corporate name;

Abate or suspend a proceeding pending by or against the corporation on the effective date of dissolution; or

Terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-14-07.
Known claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may dispose of the known claims against it by following the procedure described in this section.

The dissolved corporation shall notify its known claimants in writing of the dissolution at any time after its effective date. The written notice shall:

Describe information that shall be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address where a claim may be sent;

State the deadline, which shall not be fewer than 120 days from the effective date of the written notice, by which the dissolved corporation shall receive the claim; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against the dissolved corporation is barred:

If the corporation does not receive the claim by the deadline from a claimant who received written notice under subsection (b) of this section; or

If a claimant whose claim was rejected by written notice from the dissolved corporation does not commence a proceeding to enforce the claim within 90 days from the date of receipt of the rejection notice.

For purposes of this section, “claim” does not include a contingent liability or a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 41; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Unlike former 55A-44(b), notice to creditors and newspaper publication are not mandatory under this section.

§ 55A-14-08.
Unknown and certain other claims against dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation may also publish notice of its dissolution and request that persons with claims against the corporation present them in accordance with the notice.

The notice shall:

Be published one time in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the dissolved corporation’s principal office (or, if there is none in this State, its registered office) is or was last located;

Describe the information that shall be included in a claim and provide a mailing address where the claim may be sent; and

State that a claim against the corporation will be barred unless a proceeding to enforce the claim is commenced within five years after the publication of the notice.

If the dissolved corporation publishes a newspaper notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences a proceeding to enforce the claim against the dissolved corporation within five years after the publication date of the newspaper notice:

A claimant who did not receive written notice under

G.S. 55A-14-07

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the dissolved corporation but not acted on;

A claimant whose claim is contingent or based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution.

Nothing in this section shall bar:

Any claim alleging the liability of the corporation; or

Any proceeding or action to establish the liability of the corporation; or

The recovery on any judgment against the corporation

to the extent that the corporation is protected by insurance coverage with respect to such claim, proceeding, or judgment.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1973, c. 314, s. 5; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 41; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-14-09.
Enforcement of claims.

A claim under

G.S. 55A-14-07

or

G.S. 55A-14-08

may be enforced:

Against the dissolved corporation, to the extent of its undistributed assets, including coverage under any applicable insurance policy, or

If the assets have been distributed in liquidation, against any person, other than a creditor of the corporation, to whom the corporation distributed its property to the extent of the distributee’s pro rata share of the claim or the corporate assets distributed to such person in liquidation, whichever is less, but the distributee’s total liability for all claims under this section shall not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the distributee.

Nothing in

G.S. 55A-14-07

or

G.S. 55A-14-08

shall extend any applicable period of limitation.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 801, s. 33; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

Subdivision (a)(2), unlike former G.S. 55A-28.1(h), makes a distributee liable regardless of whether he knew that the distribution violated the Act.

§§ 55A-14-10 through 55A-14-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.